sk-SK: Povrchová úprava okraja obrúska: Vyšívaný okraj; S lemom; Lemované; Dierkovaný lem; Čipkovaný lem; Obšitý lem; Obšitý (s hustým obnitkovaním); Olemovanie pásikom; Rolovaný lem; Vlnkový okraj; Iné
sv: Servettens kantfinish: Broderad kant; Fransad; Fållad; Fållsöm; Spetskant; Merrow-kant; Overlock (överlocksöm); Pipad kant; Rullfåll; Graterad kant; Övrigt
fr: Finition du bord de la serviette: Bord brodé; À franges; Ourlet simple; Point jour; Galon en dentelle; Bord Merrow; Surjet; Bord passepoilé; Ourlet roulé; Bord festonné; Autre
pl: Wykończenie krawędzi serwetki: Haftowane wykończenie; Z frędzlami; Obszywane; Mereżkowe; Koronkowe wykończenie; Wykończenie merrow; Overlock (obszycie); Wykończenie lamówką; Podwinięty brzeg; Wykończenie falowane; Pozostałe
tr: Peçete kenarı bitişi: İşlemeli kenar; Püsküllü; Düz dikişli; Ajurlu kenar; Dantel süsler; Overlok kenar; Overlok; Biye kenar; Kıvrılmış kenar; Dalgalı kenar; Diğer
ko: 냅킨 가장자리 마감: 자수 테두리; 프린지; 박음질 마감; 투공 마감; 레이스 트림; 메로우 엣지; 오버록(서지); 파이핑 엣지; 말아올린 밑단; 스캘럽 엣지; 기타
ja: ナプキンの端の仕上げ: 刺繍エッジ; フリンジ; 縁取り; ヘムステッチ; レーストリム; メロウエッジ; オーバーロック（かがり縫い）; パイピングエッジ; ロールヘム; スキャロップエッジ; その他
de: Verarbeitung des Serviettenrandes: Bestickter Rand; Mit Fransen; Gesäumt; Hohlsaum; Spitzenbesatz; Merrow-Kante; Overlock (gekettelt); Paspelierte Kante; Rollsaum; Gezackter Rand; Sonstiges
fi: Lautasliinan reunan viimeistely: Brodeerattu reuna; Hapsukoristeltu; Päärmätty; Päärmiommel; Pitsikoristeltu; Merrow-reunainen; Huoliteltu (saumuroitu); Kanttireunainen; Rullattu helma; Kaarireunainen; Muu
el: Φινίρισμα άκρης πετσέτας: Κεντημένο άκρο; Με κρόσσια; Στριφωμένο; Ραφή αζούρ; Με δαντέλα; Άκρη Merrow; Overlock (ραφή); Σωληνωτή άκρη; Ρολό στρίφωμα; Κυματιστή άκρη; Άλλο
nl: Afwerking van servetrand: Geborduurde rand; Geborsteld; Gezoomd; Zoomsteek; Kanten biezen; Merrow-rand; Overlock-steek; Gebiesde rand; Gerolde zoom; Schulprand; Overig
th: การตกแต่งขอบผ้าเช็ดปาก: ขอบลายปัก; แบบตะเข็บ; พับเย็บริม; เย็บเก็บขอบผ้า; สายลูกไม้; เย็บขอบแบบโพ้ง; แบบโอเวอร์ล็อก (เย็บขอบ); เย็บขอบแบบกุ๊น; ขอบแบบม้วน; ขอบหยักโค้ง; อื่นๆ
es: Acabado del borde de la servilleta: Borde bordado; Con flecos; Dobladillo; Vainica; Recorte de puntilla; Borde de Merrow; Punta overlock (remallado); Borde ribeteado; Dobladillo enrollado; Borde festoneado; Otros
pt-BR: Acabamento da borda do guardanapo: Borda bordada; Franjado; Com bainha; Ponto ajur; Ornamento com laço; Borda Merrow; Acabamento overlock; Borda com debrum; Bainha enrolada; Borda ondulada; Outro
it: Finitura del bordo del tovagliolo: Bordo ricamato; Con frange; orlato; Orlo a giorno; Bordo in pizzo; Bordo Merrow; Overlock (rifilato); Bordo bordato; Orlo arrotolato; bordo smerlato; Altro
pt-PT: Acabamento da borda do guardanapo: Borda bordada; Com franjas; Bainha; Borda com ponto de bordado; Acabamento em renda; Borda Merrow; Overlock (serrilhada); Borda com debrum; Bainha enrolada; Borda recortad; Outro
bg-BG: Обработка на ръба на салфетката: Бродиран ръб; Ресни; Подгънато; Декоративен шев; Дантелен ширит; Обшит ръб; Оверлок; Кантиран ръб; Навит подгъв; Назъбен ръб; Друго
en: Napkin edge finish: Embroidered edge; Fringed; Hemmed; Hemstitch; Lace trim; Merrow edge; Overlock (serged); Piped edge; Rolled hem; Scalloped edge; Other
sl-SI: Zaključek roba prtička: Vezen rob; Z resicami; Obrobljeno; Robni šiv; Obroba s čipko; Merrow rob; Overlock (z overlockom); Obrobljen rob; Roliran rob; Nazobčan rob; Druga
nb: Serviett-kantfinish: Brodert kant; Frynsete; Hemmet; Faldesøm; Blondekant; Merrow-kant; Overlock (overlocksøm); Rørkant; Rullet kant; Kamskjellformet kant; Annet
zh-CN: 餐巾边缘处理: 绣花边; 流苏边; 卷边; 针脚边; 蕾丝边; 滚边; 包缝（锁边）; 包边; 卷边; 波浪边; 其他
hu: Szalvéta szélének kidolgozása: Hímzett szegély; Rojtozott; Szegett; Azsúrozott; Csipkézett; Hímzett szegély; Overlock (szegőöltés); Szegőzsinóros; Hajtott szél; Csipkézett szegély; Egyéb
cs: Zakončení okrajů kapesníku: Vyšívaný okraj; Roztřepení; Lemovaný; Ozdobné prolamování; Krajkový lem; Obšívaný; Overlockový; S paspulkou; Zavinutý lem; Obloučkový; Jiné
lt-LT: Servetėlės krašto apdaila: Išsiuvinėti kraštai; Su kutais; Apsiūtas; Apvadas; Nėriniuota apdaila; Merrow kraštas; Overlokas (su overloko siūlėmis); Vamzdinis kraštas; Susuktas apsiuvas; Apvalus kraštas; Kita
ro-RO: Finisaj marginii șervețelului: Margine brodată; Cu ciucuri; Tivit; Ajur; Cu dantelă; Margine Merrow; Suprafilat (surfilat); Margine cu paspoal; Tiv rulat; Margine festonată; Altele
vi: Kiểu hoàn thiện mép khăn ăn: Viền thêu; Chân may tua; Được khâu viền; Đường may rút chỉ; Trang trí ren; Viền vắt sổ dày; Vắt sổ (máy may viền); Viền gân; Chân may viền cuốn; Viền lượn sóng; Khác
ru: Обработка кромки салфетки: Вышивка; Бахрома; Подшитый; Вышивка по краю; Кружевная тесьма; Край Мерроу; Оверлок (обметочный шов); Трубчатый край; Подгиб; Зубчатый край; Другое
da: Servietkantfinish: Broderet kant; Frynset; Sømmet; Hulsøm; Udsmykning med blonder; Merrow-kant; Overlock (serged); Rørkant; Rullesøm; Takket kant; Andet
zh-TW: 餐巾收邊處理: 刺繡邊緣; 流蘇; 包邊; 抽絲; 蕾絲飾邊; 拷克邊; 包縫 (鎖邊); 內滾邊; 捲邊下擺; 扇形邊; 其他
hr-HR: Završna obrada ruba salvete: Vezeni rub; Ukrašeno; Porubljeno; Izvučeni rub; Čipkasti ukras; Merrow rub; Overlock rub (strojno obrubljeno); Rub s paspulom; Zarolani rub; Valoviti rub; Ostalo